src/derivation/crk.lexc
LEXICON Root
/ Initials ;

LEXICON I2M
/ Initials ;
/ Medials ; 
/ Finals ;

LEXICON Medials
-acaskw-:acaskw M2F ;
-aciw-:aciw M2F ;
-aciwa-:aciwa M2F ;
-acâp-:acâp M2F ;
-ahc-:ahc M2F ;
-ahk-:ahk M2F ;
-ahkamik-:ahkamik M2F ;
-ahkw-:ahkw M2F ;
-ahkwan-:ahkwan M2F ;
-ahpin-:ahpin M2F ;
-aht-:aht M2F ;
-ahâhko-:ahâhko M2F ;
-ahô-:ahô M2F ;
-ahýap-:ahýap M2F ;
-akw-:akw M2F ;
-amik-:amik M2F ;
-amêkw-:amêkw M2F ;
-amêw-:amêw M2F ;
-anak-:anak M2F ;
-anakw-:anakw M2F ;
-anakway-:anakway M2F ;
-apason-:apason M2F ;
-as-:as M2F ;
-asak-:asak M2F ;
-asakay-:asakay M2F ;
-asakâtihp-:asakâtihp M2F ;
-ascâp-:ascâp M2F ;
-asik-:asik M2F ;
-asin-:asin M2F ;
-asiskitân-:asiskitân M2F ;
-asiw-:asiw M2F ;
-ask-:ask M2F ;
-askamik-:askamik M2F ;
-askat-:askat M2F ;
-askin-:askin M2F ;
-askisin-:askisin M2F ;
-askosiy-:askosiy M2F ;
-askotê-:askotê M2F ;
-askow-:askow M2F ;
-askw-:askw M2F ;
-askwam-:askwam M2F ;
-astimw-:astimw M2F ;
-asâk-:asâk M2F ;
-asâkay-:asâkay M2F ;
-at-:at M2F ;
-ataw-:ataw M2F ;
-atay-:atay M2F ;
-atin-:atin M2F ;
-atiw-:atiw M2F ;
-atow-:atow M2F ;
-atw-:atw M2F ;
-atâ-:atâ M2F ;
-atâm-:atâm M2F ;
-atâwahk-:atâwahk M2F ;
-aw-:aw M2F ;
-aýâp-:aýâp M2F ;
-cicâhkw-:cicâhkw M2F ;
-cihc-:cihc M2F ;
-cihciy-:cihciy M2F ;
-cim-:cim M2F ;
-cisk-:cisk M2F ;
-ciwâm-:ciwâm M2F ;
-coy-:coy M2F ;
-câhkos-:câhkos M2F ;
-cân-:cân M2F ;
-câpân-:câpân M2F ;
-cêpihk-:cêpihk M2F ;
-cêpihkw-:cêpihkw M2F ;
-cêskiw-:cêskiw M2F ;
-cêskiwak-:cêskiwak M2F ;
-cîhcîkom-:cîhcîkom M2F ;
-cîhcîkw-:cîhcîkw M2F ;
-hc-:hc M2F ;
-hcikwan-:hcikwan M2F ;
-hkas-:hkas M2F ;
-hkasw-:hkasw M2F ;
-hkom-:hkom M2F ;
-hkomân-:hkomân M2F ;
-hkw-:hkw M2F ;
-hpw-:hpw M2F ;
-ht-:ht M2F ;
-htakw-:htakw M2F ;
-htawak-:htawak M2F ;
-htawakay-:htawakay M2F ;
-htw-:htw M2F ;
-icâhkw-:icâhkw M2F ;
-ihk-:ehk M2F ;
-ihkomân-:ehkomân M2F ;
-ihkw-:ehkw M2F ;
-iht-:iht M2F ;
-ihtak-:ihtak M2F ;
-ihtakw-:ihtakw M2F ;
-ihtw-:ihtw M2F ;
-ik-:ik M2F ;
-ikan-:ikan M2F ;
-ikaw-:ikaw M2F ;
-ikw-:ekw M2F ;
-ikwan-:ikwan M2F ;
-ikwân-:ikwân M2F ;
-ikâtê-:ikâtê M2F ;
-im-:im M2F ;
-isi-:isi M2F ;
-isiw-:isiw M2F ;
-iskw-:iskw M2F ;
-ito-:ito M2F ;
-itê-:itê M2F ;
-iw-:iw M2F ;
-iwi-:iwi M2F ;
-iyaw-:iyaw M2F ;
-iýaw-:iýaw M2F ;
-iýawê-:iýawê M2F ;
-iýihk-:iýihk M2F ;
-iýihkw-:iýihkw M2F ;
-kam-:kam M2F ;
-kamikw-:kamikw M2F ;
-kan-:kan M2F ;
-kas-:kas M2F ;
-kimâw-:kimâw M2F ;
-kohtâkan-:kohtâkan M2F ;
-kon-:kon M2F ;
-kosis-:kosis M2F ;
-kot-:kot M2F ;
-kw-:kw M2F ;
-kwan-:kwan M2F ;
-kwayaw-:kwayaw M2F ;
-kwêmês-:kwêmês M2F ;
-kât-:kât M2F ;
-mak-:mak M2F ;
-miht-:miht M2F ;
-min-:min M2F ;
-minak-:minak M2F ;
-mis-:mis M2F ;
-mosôm-:mosôm M2F ;
-mâkw-:mâkw M2F ;
-mâmâ-:mâmâ M2F ;
-nahâhk-:nahâhk M2F ;
-nahâhkisîm-:nahâhkisîm M2F ;
-niht-:niht M2F ;
-nikw-:nikw M2F ;
-nisk-:nisk M2F ;
-ohk-:ohk M2F ;
-ohkom-:ohkom M2F ;
-oht-:oht M2F ;
-ohtâwiy-:ohtâwiy M2F ;
-ok-:ok M2F ;
-okas-:okas M2F ;
-okwê-:okwê M2F ;
-okê-:okê M2F ;
-owat-:owat M2F ;
-pak-:pak M2F ;
-paýiho-:paýiho M2F ;
-pim-:pim M2F ;
-pipon-:pipon M2F ;
-piponw-:piponw M2F ;
-piskwan-:piskwan M2F ;
-piton-:piton M2F ;
-piy-:piy M2F ;
-pwâm-:pwâm M2F ;
-pâpâ-:pâpâ M2F ;
-pêk-:pêk M2F ;
-pêm-:pêm M2F ;
-pêst-:pêst M2F ;
-sikiwak-:sikiwak M2F ;
-sikos-:sikos M2F ;
-sip-:sip M2F ;
-sis-:sis M2F ;
-sit-:sit M2F ;
-sitân-:sitân M2F ;
-sk-:sk M2F ;
-skam-:skam M2F ;
-skamik-:skamik M2F ;
-skanaw-:skanaw M2F ;
-skat-:skat M2F ;
-skiw-:skiw M2F ;
-skiwak-:skiwak M2F ;
-skot-:skot M2F ;
-skotâkay-:skotâkay M2F ;
-skow-:skow M2F ;
-skw-:skw M2F ;
-skwam-:skwam M2F ;
-skât-:skât M2F ;
-skîsikw-:skîsikw M2F ;
-soy-:soy M2F ;
-sp-:sp M2F ;
-spakw-:spakw M2F ;
-spiskwan-:spiskwan M2F ;
-spiton-:spiton M2F ;
-spwâkan-:spwâkan M2F ;
-stikwân-:stikwân M2F ;
-sâw-:sâw M2F ;
-sîh-:sîh M2F ;
-sîht-:sîht M2F ;
-sîhtw-:sîhtw M2F ;
-sîm-:sîm M2F ;
-sôkan-:sôkan M2F ;
-tahtahkwan-:tahtahkwan M2F ;
-takisiy-:takisiy M2F ;
-tihtiman-:tihtiman M2F ;
-tipisk-:tipisk M2F ;
-tis-:tis M2F ;
-tiy-:tiy M2F ;
-tohtôs-:tohtôs M2F ;
-tokan-:tokan M2F ;
-ton-:ton M2F ;
-tow-:tow M2F ;
-towat-:towat M2F ;
-tânis-:tânis M2F ;
-tâp-:tâp M2F ;
-tâpiskan-:tâpiskan M2F ;
-tâpân-:tâpân M2F ;
-tâs-:tâs M2F ;
-têh-:têh M2F ;
-têm-:têm M2F ;
-têskan-:têskan M2F ;
-têýaniy-:têýaniy M2F ;
-têýikom-:têýikom M2F ;
-tôkan-:tôkan M2F ;
-tôn-:tôn M2F ;
-tôtêm-:tôtêm M2F ;
-wask-:wask M2F ;
-waskw-:waskw M2F ;
-wat-:wat M2F ;
-wêw-:wêw M2F ;
-yaw-:yaw M2F ;
-â-:â M2F ;
-âciw-:âciw M2F ;
-âciwa-:âciwa M2F ;
-âh-:âh M2F ;
-âhkatoso-:âhkatoso M2F ;
-âhkw-:âhkw M2F ;
-âhp-:âhp M2F ;
-âhpin-:âhpin M2F ;
-âhtak-:âhtak M2F ;
-âhtaw-:âhtaw M2F ;
-âhtikw-:âhtikw M2F ;
-âkam-:âkam M2F ;
-âkan-:âkan M2F ;
-âkon-:âkon M2F ;
-âkw-:âkw M2F ;
-âniskw-:âniskw M2F ;
-âp-:âp M2F ;
-âpa-:âpa M2F ;
-âpaht-:âpaht M2F ;
-âpakwaniy-:âpakwaniy M2F ;
-âpasw-:âpasw M2F ;
-âpisk-:âpisk M2F ;
-âpiskan-:âpiskan M2F ;
-âpiskw-:âpiskw M2F ;
-âpit-:âpit M2F ;
-âposw-:âposw M2F ;
-âpow-:âpow M2F ;
-âpwêw-:âpwêw M2F ;
-âpâkw-:âpâkw M2F ;
-âpâw-:âpâw M2F ;
-âpê-:âpê M2F ;
-âpêk-:âpêk M2F ;
-âpêmakw-:âpêmakw M2F ;
-âpêw-:âpêw M2F ;
-âpîhk-:âpîhk M2F ;
-âsiyân-:âsiyân M2F ;
-âsk-:âsk M2F ;
-âskamik-:âskamik M2F ;
-âskikan-:âskikan M2F ;
-âskw-:âskw M2F ;
-âsok-:âsok M2F ;
-âspin-:âspin M2F ;
-âst-:âst M2F ;
-âstaw-:âstaw M2F ;
-âstê-:âstê M2F ;
-âsê-:âsê M2F ;
-ât-:ât M2F ;
-âtak-:âtak M2F ;
-âtihp-:âtihp M2F ;
-âtim-:âtim M2F ;
-âton-:âton M2F ;
-âw-:âw M2F ;
-âwahk-:âwahk M2F ;
-âwikan-:âwikan M2F ;
-âyow-:âyow M2F ;
-âýaw-:âýaw M2F ;
-âýow-:âýow M2F ;
-ê-:ê M2F ;
-êhkw-:êhkw M2F ;
-êk-:êk M2F ;
-êkinw-:êkinw M2F ;
-êskihkw-:êskihkw M2F ;
-êstaw-:êstaw M2F ;
-êyâpiy-:êyâpiy M2F ;
-êýi-:êýi M2F ;
-êýikom-:êýikom M2F ;
-êńi-:êńi M2F ;
-îhtw-:îhtw M2F ;
-îk-:îk M2F ;
-îtisân-:îtisân M2F ;
-îw-:îw M2F ;
-ôhk-:ôhk M2F ;
-ôs-:ôs M2F ;
-ôspo-:ôspo M2F ;
-ôsê-:ôsê M2F ;
-ôsêw-:ôsêw M2F ;
-ôt-:ôt M2F ;
-ôtêw-:ôtêw M2F ;
-ýihk-:ýihk M2F ;
-ýow-:ýow M2F ;
-ýâkan-:ýâkan M2F ;
-ýâpîhk-:ýâpîhk M2F ;
-ýâst-:ýâst M2F ;
-ýîhk-:ýîhk M2F ;

LEXICON M2F
/ Medials ;
/ Finals ;

LEXICON Initials
ahcâpiy-:ahcâpiy I2M ;
ahpin-:ahpin I2M ;
ak-:ak I2M ;
akim-:akim I2M ;
akoht-:akoht I2M ;
akwahon-:akwahon I2M ;
akwaskw-:akwaskw I2M ;
akâw-:akâw I2M ;
anikwacâs-:anikwacâs I2M ;
apahkw-:apahkw I2M ;
apis-:apis I2M ;
apoy-:apoy I2M ;
asam-:asam I2M ;
asin-:asin I2M ;
asiskiy-:asiskiy I2M ;
askamik-:askamik I2M ;
askow-:askow I2M ;
aspat-:aspat I2M ;
astinwân-:astinwân I2M ;
astotin-:astotin I2M ;
asw-:asw I2M ;
asê-:asê I2M ;
atam-:atam I2M ;
atimw-:atimw I2M ;
atosk-:atosk I2M ;
atâwê-:atâwê I2M ;
awaT-:awaT I2M ;
awih-:awih I2M ;
ay-:ay I2M ;
ayiniso-:ayiniso I2M ;
ayâsî-:ayâsî I2M ;
ayêhkwêw-:ayêhkwêw I2M ;
aý-:aý I2M ;
aýisat-:aýisat I2M ;
aýîk-:aýîk I2M ;
cacêm-:cacêm I2M ;
cihcîk-:cihcîk I2M ;
cikawâs-:cikawâs I2M ;
cimis-:cimis I2M ;
ciýâhâ-:ciýâhâ I2M ;
cêcêm-:cêcêm I2M ;
cîhcîp-:cîhcîp I2M ;
cîm-:cîm I2M ;
cîpw-:cîpw I2M ;
cîsk-:cîsk I2M ;
cîwê-:cîwê I2M ;
ihk-:ihk I2M ;
ihtas-:ihtas I2M ;
iskotê-:iskotê I2M ;
iskwâht-:iskwâht I2M ;
iskwêw-:iskwêw I2M ;
ispisî-:ispisî I2M ;
isî-:isî I2M ;
itow-:itow I2M ;
iýi-:iýi I2M ;
iýîhkw-:iýîhkw I2M ;
kakihcim-:kakihcim I2M ;
kakwâtak-:kakwâtak I2M ;
kakwêyât-:kakwêyât I2M ;
kakêk-:kakêk I2M ;
kamâmakw-:kamâmakw I2M ;
kap-:kap I2M ;
kask-:kask I2M ;
kaskitê-:kaskitê I2M ;
katikoni-:katikoni I2M ;
kawâhk-:kawâhk I2M ;
kayêy-:kayêy I2M ;
kiht-:kiht I2M ;
kihîw-:kihîw I2M ;
kimot-:kimot I2M ;
kinosêw-:kinosêw I2M ;
kipihk-:kipihk I2M ;
kis-:kis I2M ;
kisiskâ-:kisiskâ I2M ;
kisk-:kisk I2M ;
kiskinw-:kiskinw I2M ;
kiskiw-:kiskiw I2M ;
kispêw-:kispêw I2M ;
kisât-:kisât I2M ;
kisîpêk-:kisîpêk I2M ;
kitimâk-:kitimâk I2M ;
kitâp-:kitâp I2M ;
kiyomâ-:kiyomâ I2M ;
kiyâskw-:kiyâskw I2M ;
kiýâskî-:kiýâskî I2M ;
koht-:koht I2M ;
kosikw-:kosikw I2M ;
kost-:kost I2M ;
kotap-:kotap I2M ;
kotokw-:kotokw I2M ;
kwayaskw-:kwayaskw I2M ;
kwaýasitê-:kwaýasitê I2M ;
kwâpik-:kwâpik I2M ;
kwâskwê-:kwâskwê I2M ;
kwêt-:kwêt I2M ;
kwêtipa-:kwêtipa I2M ;
kwîtw-:kwîtw I2M ;
kâhkâkiw-:kâhkâkiw I2M ;
kâkîs-:kâkîs I2M ;
kâsak-:kâsak I2M ;
kâskw-:kâskw I2M ;
kât-:kât I2M ;
kêhcik-:kêhcik I2M ;
kêhtinâ-:kêhtinâ I2M ;
kêkâ-:kêkâ I2M ;
kêsiyohw-:kêsiyohw I2M ;
kêtisk-:kêtisk I2M ;
kîhcit-:kîhcit I2M ;
kîhkwahâhkêw-:kîhkwahâhkêw I2M ;
kîhkîhk-:kîhkîhk I2M ;
kîkw-:kîkw I2M ;
kînik-:kînik I2M ;
kîs-:kîs I2M ;
kîsinât-:kîsinât I2M ;
kîskwê-:kîskwê I2M ;
kîspinamâkosi-:kîspinamâkosi I2M ;
kîsô-:kîsô I2M ;
kîwê-:kîwê I2M ;
kôn-:kôn I2M ;
macihkiwis-:macihkiwis I2M ;
mahk-:mahk I2M ;
mahýakw-:mahýakw I2M ;
mamisî-:mamisî I2M ;
man-:man I2M ;
manât-:manât I2M ;
maskam-:maskam I2M ;
maskisin-:maskisin I2M ;
maskw-:maskw I2M ;
mat-:mat I2M ;
matwê-:matwê I2M ;
mawimo-:mawimo I2M ;
mawîhk-:mawîhk I2M ;
micim-:micim I2M ;
mihcâskw-:mihcâskw I2M ;
mihkawak-:mihkawak I2M ;
mihtam-:mihtam I2M ;
mihýawê-:mihýawê I2M ;
mikiskon-:mikiskon I2M ;
min-:min I2M ;
minihkw-:minihkw I2M ;
misakâ-:misakâ I2M ;
misawât-:misawât I2M ;
misipot-:misipot I2M ;
misiwê-:misiwê I2M ;
miskocê-:miskocê I2M ;
mist-:mist I2M ;
misw-:misw I2M ;
mitim-:mitim I2M ;
mitâtahtw-:mitâtahtw I2M ;
miýahciwânân-:miýahciwânân I2M ;
miýâkw-:miýâkw I2M ;
mohýâpiciskân-:mohýâpiciskân I2M ;
mosis-:mosis I2M ;
mostâpêk-:mostâpêk I2M ;
mwêst-:mwêst I2M ;
mâcikôtitâk-:mâcikôtitâk I2M ;
mâhtakw-:mâhtakw I2M ;
mâmaw-:mâmaw I2M ;
mâninakis-:mâninakis I2M ;
mâskôt-:mâskôt I2M ;
mâwat-:mâwat I2M ;
mêkwâ-:mêkwâ I2M ;
mêstan-:mêstan I2M ;
mîcimôc-:mîcimôc I2M ;
mîk-:mîk I2M ;
mîs-:mîs I2M ;
mîtos-:mîtos I2M ;
môhkahosiw-:môhkahosiw I2M ;
môsk-:môsk I2M ;
nah-:nah I2M ;
nakah-:nakah I2M ;
nam-:nam I2M ;
namêw-:namêw I2M ;
nanâtohk-:nanâtohk I2M ;
napatê-:napatê I2M ;
naskwah-:naskwah I2M ;
nataw-:nataw I2M ;
nawê-:nawê I2M ;
nihtiy-:nihtiy I2M ;
nikotw-:nikotw I2M ;
nimitâw-:nimitâw I2M ;
nipê-:nipê I2M ;
nisk-:nisk I2M ;
nitawât-:nitawât I2M ;
nosonê-:nosonê I2M ;
nânihk-:nânihk I2M ;
nâtwâ-:nâtwâ I2M ;
nênâpos-:nênâpos I2M ;
nîkân-:nîkân I2M ;
nîpâ-:nîpâ I2M ;
nôhtaw-:nôhtaw I2M ;
o-:o I2M ;
ocipw-:ocipw I2M ;
ocîskimow-:ocîskimow I2M ;
ohpwê-:ohpwê I2M ;
okihcitâw-:okihcitâw I2M ;
okîskimanasiw-:okîskimanasiw I2M ;
onîcâniw-:onîcâniw I2M ;
osk-:osk I2M ;
oskâhtakw-:oskâhtakw I2M ;
osê-:osê I2M ;
otihtapi-:otihtapi I2M ;
otônapiy-:otônapiy I2M ;
pahkah-:pahkah I2M ;
pakam-:pakam I2M ;
pakos-:pakos I2M ;
pakâ-:pakâ I2M ;
papâs-:papâs I2M ;
pasakw-:pasakw I2M ;
paskê-:paskê I2M ;
patotê-:patotê I2M ;
pici-:pici I2M ;
pikiht-:pikiht I2M ;
pimit-:pimit I2M ;
pipikw-:pipikw I2M ;
pisisk-:pisisk I2M ;
pisw-:pisw I2M ;
post-:post I2M ;
pwâtaw-:pwâtaw I2M ;
pâhkw-:pâhkw I2M ;
pâk-:pâk I2M ;
pâst-:pâst I2M ;
pê-:pê I2M ;
pêsiw-:pêsiw I2M ;
pîhk-:pîhk I2M ;
pîkin-:pîkin I2M ;
pîs-:pîs I2M ;
pîsâkw-:pîsâkw I2M ;
pômê-:pômê I2M ;
pôt-:pôt I2M ;
sam-:sam I2M ;
sasâkw-:sasâkw I2M ;
sihkw-:sihkw I2M ;
sikwat-:sikwat I2M ;
sip-:sip I2M ;
sisow-:sisow I2M ;
sâkow-:sâkow I2M ;
sâm-:sâm I2M ;
sâsakit-:sâsakit I2M ;
sêh-:sêh I2M ;
sênipân-:sênipân I2M ;
sêsêsiw-:sêsêsiw I2M ;
sîhkîhp-:sîhkîhp I2M ;
sîkw-:sîkw I2M ;
sîpw-:sîpw I2M ;
sîsîkwêw-:sîsîkwêw I2M ;
sôhkê-:sôhkê I2M ;
sôskw-:sôskw I2M ;
tahkw-:tahkw I2M ;
takwanâw-:takwanâw I2M ;
tast-:tast I2M ;
tat-:tat I2M ;
tim-:tim I2M ;
tipiýaw-:tipiýaw I2M ;
tâcik-:tâcik I2M ;
tâpis-:tâpis I2M ;
tâs-:tâs I2M ;
tâwati-:tâwati I2M ;
têniki-:têniki I2M ;
têw-:têw I2M ;
tôstôsk-:tôstôsk I2M ;
wahakay-:wahakay I2M ;
wanihik-:wanihik I2M ;
wasakw-:wasakw I2M ;
waskâtay-:waskâtay I2M ;
watôw-:watôw I2M ;
wayacâw-:wayacâw I2M ;
wiyakât-:wiyakât I2M ;
wiýak-:wiýak I2M ;
wâhkw-:wâhkw I2M ;
wânaskê-:wânaskê I2M ;
wâpisk-:wâpisk I2M ;
wâsitê-:wâsitê I2M ;
wâstê-:wâstê I2M ;
wâwiyak-:wâwiyak I2M ;
wâýinw-:wâýinw I2M ;
wêwêk-:wêwêk I2M ;
wîhk-:wîhk I2M ;
wîhp-:wîhp I2M ;
wîniy-:wîniy I2M ;
wîskacân-:wîskacân I2M ;
wîsâ-:wîsâ I2M ;
yîkatê-:yîkatê I2M ;
âhkiskow-:âhkiskow I2M ;
âkaýâsiw-:âkaýâsiw I2M ;
âmow-:âmow I2M ;
âpat-:âpat I2M ;
âsitê-:âsitê I2M ;
âsw-:âsw I2M ;
âwat-:âwat I2M ;
êkwayâk-:êkwayâk I2M ;
êwakw-:êwakw I2M ;
îtaw-:îtaw I2M ;
ôtênaw-:ôtênaw I2M ;
ýâhk-:ýâhk I2M ;
ýâýik-:ýâýik I2M ;
ýîk-:ýîk I2M ;
ýôhtê-:ýôhtê I2M ;
